Colorado statutes. TITLE 26.5 Early Childhood Programs and Services
PART 2
COLORADO UNIVERSAL PRESCHOOL PROGRAM

26.5-4-201. Short title.

The short title of this part 2 is the "Colorado Universal Preschool Program Act".

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 686, § 3, effective July 1.

26.5-4-202. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly finds and declares that:

Colorado has prioritized early learning through its investments in the Colorado preschool program, established in 1988, and full-day kindergarten, adopted in 2019;

Since establishing the Colorado preschool program, Colorado has steadily increased its investment in high-quality preschool programming, securing a significant return on investment by improving child outcomes year over year by expanding access to preschool for children in low-income families and those who are at risk of entering kindergarten without being prepared to learn;

State and national research demonstrate the positive and long- and short-term impacts of high-quality preschool, including improved early literacy, reduced grade retention, decreased probability of developing a significant reading deficiency, improved performance on statewide standards-based assessments, and increased rate of high school graduation;

Research demonstrates that economically disadvantaged children derive greater benefits from preschool programs in states that offer universal programs than in states that offer preschool programs specifically for economically disadvantaged children;

In the 2020 general election, the voters of Colorado approved proposition EE by a nearly two-to-one margin, establishing a dedicated source of funding for statewide, voluntary, universal preschool programming for children in the year preceding kindergarten and for additional preschool programming for children in low-income families and children who are at risk of entering kindergarten without being prepared to learn. With the passage of this measure, Colorado voters in rural, urban, and suburban communities have demonstrated their strong commitment to expanding access to quality preschool for children regardless of their economic circumstances.

Creating a statewide mixed delivery system of preschool providers to make preschool programming universally available to children throughout Colorado compounds the benefits for children who are in low-income families and increases the ultimate social and economic benefits of high-quality preschool programming for the state as a whole.

The general assembly finds, therefore, that it is in the best interests of the state and consistent with the will of the voters of Colorado to establish the Colorado universal preschool program to provide high-quality, voluntary preschool programming through a mixed delivery system for children throughout the state in the year preceding kindergarten enrollment and to provide for additional preschool services for children who are in low-income families or who meet identified qualifying factors.

The general assembly further finds and declares that:

In 2000, the voters approved section 17 of article IX of the state constitution, which requires the general assembly to annually increase, by at least the rate of inflation, the statewide base per pupil funding, as defined by the "Public School Finance Act of 1994", article 54 of title 22, for public education from preschool through twelfth grade;

In the 2001-02 fiscal year and in every fiscal year since, the increases to statewide base per pupil funding have automatically applied to funding for preschool services provided by school districts, because the funding for preschool services has been calculated through the school finance formula established in article 54 of title 22, which applies to funding for public elementary and secondary education;

To effectively and efficiently provide preschool services through a mixed delivery system of school- and community-based preschool providers, and to ensure that funding calculations account for the unique standards and features of preschool programs, state funding for preschool services, including preschool services for children with disabilities, must be appropriated and allocated separately from the funding for public elementary and secondary education, and, beginning in the 2023-24 fiscal year, the statewide base per pupil funding amount set annually for public elementary and secondary education will no longer apply to funding for preschool services;

To continue to meet the intent of section 17 (1) of article IX of the state constitution with regard to funding for preschool services, it is appropriate for the department of early childhood to establish a per-child constitutional compliance rate for the 2023-24 fiscal year that equals the portion of the statewide base per pupil funding amount established for the 2023-24 fiscal year that applies to the number of hours of universal preschool services provided to an eligible child, and to increase the per-child constitutional compliance rate annually by the rate of inflation.

The general assembly, therefore, declares that, by establishing a per-child constitutional compliance rate and ensuring that the per-child rate that the department annually establishes for universal preschool services and for preschool services provided to children who are three years of age or younger meets or exceeds the per-child constitutional compliance rate, funding for the Colorado universal preschool program substantially complies with the requirements of section 17 (1) of article IX of the state constitution.

The general assembly further finds and declares that:

In approving proposition EE, the voters supported funding for ten hours of high-quality preschool programming for all Colorado children in the year preceding kindergarten enrollment, as well as additional preschool programming for children who are at risk of entering kindergarten without being prepared to learn, including children in low-income families;

Research demonstrates that participating in high-quality preschool programs helps to ensure that children in low-income families are able to enter kindergarten on par with their peers in higher-income families; and

For the preschool program to serve children equitably, the state must invest in additional hours of preschool programming for children in low-income families, in addition to funding the ten hours of universal preschool services.

The general assembly finds, therefore, that it is in the best interests of the state to allocate the amount appropriated for the Colorado universal preschool program to provide adequate funding for both a high-quality universal preschool program and additional preschool programming for children in low-income families.

The general assembly recognizes the requirement of the federal "Individuals with Disabilities Education Act", 20 U.S.C. sec. 1400 et seq., as amended, to provide educational services to every three- or four-year-old child with a disability, in accordance with the child's individualized education program. The general assembly declares that, for purposes of section 17 of article IX of the state constitution, meeting the obligation of serving all three- and four-year-old children with disabilities through the Colorado universal preschool program is an important element of expanding the availability of preschool programs and may therefore receive funding from the state education fund created in section 17 (4) of article IX of the state constitution.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 686, § 3, effective July 1.

26.5-4-203. Definitions.

As used in this part 2, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Additional preschool services" means hours of preschool services provided to a child in the year preceding enrollment in kindergarten that are in addition to the universal preschool services the child receives.

"Charter school" means a charter school that is:

A district charter school authorized pursuant to part 1 of article 30.5 of title 22, an institute charter school authorized pursuant to part 5 of article 30.5 of title 22, or a charter school authorized by the Colorado school for the deaf and the blind pursuant to section 22-80-102 (4)(b);

Authorized in its charter contract to provide preschool services; and

Licensed pursuant to part 3 of article 5 of this title 26.5 to operate as a preschool provider.

"Children with disabilities" has the same meaning as provided in section 22-20-103.

"Colorado universal preschool program" or "preschool program" means the program established within the department pursuant to section 26.5-4-204, and includes all participating preschool providers.

"Community plan" means the community plan adopted by a local coordinating organization pursuant to section 26.5-2-104.

"ECEA" means the "Exceptional Children's Educational Act", article 20 of title 22, and its implementing rules.

"Eligible child" means a child who is eligible to receive preschool services as provided in section 26.5-4-204 (3).

"IDEA" means the federal "Individuals with Disabilities Education Act", 20 U.S.C. sec. 1400 et seq., as amended, and its implementing regulations.

"Individualized education program" has the same meaning as provided in section 22-20-103.

"Inflation" means the annual percentage change in the United States department of labor bureau of labor statistics consumer price index for Denver-Aurora-Lakewood for all items paid by all urban consumers, or its applicable successor index.

"Local coordinating organization" means the entity selected by the department pursuant to section 26.5-2-103 to implement a community plan for early childhood and family support programs and services within a specified community.

"Mixed delivery system" means a system for delivering preschool services through a combination of school- and community-based preschool providers, which include family child care homes, child care centers, and head start agencies, that are funded by a combination of public and private money.

"Parent" has the same meaning as provided in section 22-20-103.

"Preschool provider" means any of the following entities that are licensed pursuant to part 3 of article 5 of this title 26.5:

A family child care home, as defined in section 26.5-5-303;

A child care center, as defined in section 26.5-5-303;

A school district licensed to operate as a public preschool provider;

A charter school licensed to operate as a public preschool provider; or

A head start program.

"Qualifying factor" means a child or family circumstance, as identified by department rule pursuant to section 26.5-4-204 (4)(a)(II), that may negatively impact a child's cognitive, academic, social, physical, or behavioral health or development.

"School district" means a school district organized pursuant to article 30 of title 22 that provides preschool services and is licensed pursuant to part 3 of article 5 of this title 26.5 as a preschool provider; or a board of cooperative services organized pursuant to article 5 of title 22 that provides preschool services and is licensed pursuant to part 3 of article 5 of this title 26.5 as a preschool provider.

"Universal preschool services" means ten hours of preschool services per week made available, at no charge, to children in the state during the school year preceding the school year in which a child is eligible to enroll in kindergarten.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 688, § 3, effective July 1.

26.5-4-204. Colorado universal preschool program - created - eligibility - rules - workforce development plan.

There is created in the department the Colorado universal preschool program. The department shall administer the preschool program in accordance with this part 2 and shall ensure that, for the 2023-24 school year and school years thereafter, families may enroll their children in preschool providers that receive funding through the preschool program. The purposes of the preschool program are:

To provide children in Colorado access to voluntary, high-quality, universal preschool services free of charge in the school year before a child enrolls in kindergarten;

To provide access to additional preschool services in the school year before kindergarten eligibility for children in low-income families and children who lack overall learning readiness due to qualifying factors;

To provide access to preschool services for children who are three years of age, or in limited circumstances younger than three years of age, and are children with disabilities, are in low-income families, or lack overall learning readiness due to qualifying factors; and

To establish quality standards for publicly funded preschool providers that promote children's early learning and development, school readiness, and healthy beginnings.

For the 2023-24 school year and each school year thereafter, subject to the availability and enrollment capacity of preschool providers, parents throughout the state may enroll their children, free of charge, in ten hours per week of publicly funded preschool services for the school year preceding the school year in which the children are eligible to enroll in kindergarten. The department, working with local coordinating organizations, shall identify and recruit preschool providers throughout the state to participate in the Colorado universal preschool program. In identifying and recruiting preschool providers, the department and local coordinating organizations shall, to the extent practicable, establish a mixed delivery system in communities throughout the state that enables parents to select preschool providers for their children from as broad a range as possible within their respective communities.

For the 2023-24 school year and for each school year thereafter:

Subject to the availability and capacity of preschool providers, every child in the state may receive ten hours of preschool services per week, at no charge, during the school year preceding the school year in which the child is eligible to enroll in kindergarten.

Pursuant to IDEA and ECEA, every child who is three or four years of age and is a child with disabilities must be offered preschool services in accordance with the child's individualized education program.

Subject to available appropriations, a child who is three years of age, is not eligible to enroll in kindergarten in the next school year, and is in a low-income family or meets at least one qualifying factor may receive the number of hours of preschool services established by department rule.

Subject to available appropriations, a community in which a school district operated a district preschool program pursuant to article 28 of title 22, as it exists prior to July 1, 2023, with a waiver to serve children under three years of age, may continue to provide preschool services for the number of hours established by department rule for the same number of children under three years of age that received preschool services in the 2022-23 school year, so long as each child who receives the preschool services is in a low-income family or meets at least one qualifying factor.

Subject to available appropriations, a child who is in a low-income family or who meets at least one qualifying factor may receive additional preschool services for the number of hours established by department rule in the school year preceding the school year in which the child is eligible to enroll in kindergarten.

Notwithstanding any provision of subsection (3)(a) of this section to the contrary:

The state shall provide to each three- or four-year-old child with a disability whose parent enrolls the child in the preschool program an educational program in accordance with IDEA and ECEA and the child's individualized education program; and

For a school year in which federal money is provided to the state to fund preschool, other than federal money provided through IDEA, the executive director may allocate said funding to provide the number of hours of preschool services allowed under federal law for all children defined as eligible under federal law.

The number of hours of preschool services that an eligible child may receive pursuant to subsection (3)(a)(III) or (3)(a)(IV) of this section; except that the number of hours for an eligible child who is a child with disabilities are determined in accordance with IDEA, ECEA, and the child's individualized education program;

The number of hours of additional preschool services that an eligible child may receive pursuant to subsection (3)(a)(V) of this section; except that the number of hours for an eligible child who is a child with disabilities are determined in accordance with IDEA, ECEA, and the child's individualized education program;

Preschool quality standards, as provided in section 26.5-4-205;

The formulas for setting the per-child rates for universal preschool services, for preschool services for children with disabilities, for preschool services for eligible children who are three years of age or younger as described in subsections (3)(a)(III) and (3)(a)(IV) of this section, and for additional preschool services, as provided in section 26.5-4-208; and

Such other rules as are required in this part 2 or as may be necessary to implement the preschool program.

The executive director shall adopt rules to implement the preschool program, which must include:

(I) The level of income that identifies a family as being low-income for purposes of identifying children who are three years of age or younger and are eligible for preschool services and prioritizing funding for those additional preschool services. The executive director shall, to the extent practicable, ensure that the income eligibility requirements for other publicly funded child care programs are aligned with the income level set pursuant to this subsection (4)(a)(I).

(II) The qualifying factors that a child must meet to be eligible to receive additional preschool services. The executive director shall ensure that the qualifying factors are reviewed and, as necessary, revised at least every five years. The purpose of the qualifying factors is to identify children who are at risk of entering kindergarten without being ready for school. The qualifying factors must include identification as a dual-language learner or a child with disabilities and may include such other factors as the department may identify.

In adopting rules, the executive director shall, to the extent possible:

Align all rules pertaining to funding and preschool provider requirements to facilitate combining and coordinating federal, state, preschool program, and child care funding to the greatest extent allowed under state and federal law and regulation; and

Align preschool quality standards and requirements with the child care licensing requirements and licensing requirements for school district and charter school preschool programs, as provided in part 3 of article 5 of this title 26.5, to reduce conflicts and duplication.

In developing a plan for recruiting, training, and retaining a well-compensated, well-prepared, high-quality statewide early childhood workforce pursuant to section 26.5-6-101, the department shall ensure that the plan specifically addresses strategies for building and supporting the preschool workforce, especially with respect to:

Simplifying the process for attaining credentials, meeting qualifications, and demonstrating professional competencies;

Minimizing regulatory and administrative barriers to entry, including barriers faced by individuals who speak languages other than English;

Increasing diversity in the preschool workforce;

Establishing goals for increasing the qualifications of preschool teachers over time, including strategies for achieving the goal of supporting increased attainment of baccalaureate degrees in early childhood or baccalaureate degrees with supplemental early learning credentials for lead teachers employed by preschool providers; and

Recruiting, compensating, providing continuing professional development for, and retaining individuals in the preschool workforce, including strategies for achieving the goal of compensating those individuals at a living wage.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 690, § 3, effective July 1.

26.5-4-205. Quality standards - evaluation - support.

The department shall develop and the executive director shall establish by rule the quality standards that each preschool provider must meet to receive funding through the Colorado universal preschool program. The quality standards must, at a minimum, address the issues specified in this section and must reflect national and community-informed best practices with regard to school readiness, academic and cognitive development, healthy environments, social-emotional learning, and child and family outcomes. The department and the executive director shall work with families, educators, and program administrators to review and, as necessary, revise the quality standards at least every five years to ensure the standards continue to reflect national best practices and meet the other requirements specified in this section. In developing, reviewing, revising, and adopting the quality standards, the department and the executive director shall consider, at a minimum:

The quality standards established for preschool providers participating in the Colorado preschool program pursuant to article 28 of title 22, as it exists prior to July 1, 2023;

Nationally accepted standards for preschool programs;

The child care licensing requirements established pursuant to part 3 of article 5 of this title 26.5 with which preschool providers are required to comply; and

The need to ensure the availability of preschool services for eligible children throughout the state while maintaining the quality of the preschool providers.

Except as provided in subsection (1)(b)(II) of this section, the department shall ensure that each preschool provider that participates in the preschool program meets the quality standards established by rule in accordance with this section. The department may work with a local coordinating organization to ensure that a preschool provider meets the quality standards. The department may prohibit a preschool provider that fails to meet one or more of the quality standards from participating in the preschool program.

If necessary to ensure the availability of a mixed delivery system within a community, the department may allow a preschool provider that does not meet the quality standards to participate in the preschool program for a limited time while working toward compliance with the quality standards; except that each preschool provider must meet all quality standards relating to health and safety as a condition of participating in the preschool program.

At a minimum, the quality standards established in rule must include:

The minimum numbers of contact hours of instructional services per school year for universal preschool services for preschool services provided to children three years of age and younger, and for additional preschool services. The minimum number of contact hours of instructional services established in rule for universal preschool services must not be less than three hundred sixty hours per school year.

A requirement that each preschool provider provide eligible children an equal opportunity to enroll and receive preschool services regardless of race, ethnicity, religious affiliation, sexual orientation, gender identity, lack of housing, income level, or disability, as such characteristics and circumstances apply to the child or the child's family;

The maximum allowable educator-to-child ratios and group sizes, aligned with national best practices. The department, by rule, may implement a waiver process to allow a preschool provider that implements a nationally recognized preschool program model to implement the educator-to-child ratios and group sizes that support the instructional practices of the model, so long as the preschool provider meets the national standards for the model or is accredited to provide the model.

Qualifications for preschool teachers. The quality standards must not require preschool teachers to be licensed pursuant to article 60.5 of title 22 and must allow a preschool provider to employ a nonlicensed preschool teacher as long as the teacher meets other qualifications established in department rule. The department shall work with the department of education to ensure that a preschool educator may meet the qualifications for preschool educators by demonstrating compliance with the qualifications for an early childhood teaching license endorsement provided by the department of education.

Requirements for continuing professional development for teachers employed by a preschool provider, which must be focused on improving teacher-child interactions and quality of instruction, including improving fidelity in implementing evidence-based curricula and student outcomes, and may allow for training in early language and literacy development and the science of reading that is appropriate for early childhood education and comparable to the training required for early grade teachers pursuant to the "Colorado READ Act", part 12 of article 7 of title 22. The department shall work with the department of education to allow, to the fullest extent possible, a teacher who is licensed by the department of education to use the professional development required to renew the teaching license to also meet the professional development requirements established by the department for teachers employed by a preschool provider.

Standards for preschool services that, at a minimum, are aligned with the Colorado early learning and development guidelines across all early childhood domains approved by the early childhood leadership commission and with the Colorado academic standards adopted by the state board of education pursuant to section 22-7-1005, are culturally inclusive, and are supported by the department in implementation;

Standards for instructional practice that, at a minimum, must ensure that the instructional practice implemented by preschool providers:

Promotes learning through developmentally appropriate practices that include a mix of structured activities and play; and

Increases and supports learning using instructional practices that build on previous learning and include a focus on age-appropriate classroom environments and ongoing informal assessments of learning;

Limitations on the use of, and required procedures for, out-of-school suspension and expulsion in accordance with section 22-33-106.1. In addition, to reduce the use of exclusionary discipline, the standards must reflect best practices in early childhood mental health, including promoting access to early childhood mental health consultation.

Standards for family and community engagement to ensure that the preschool provider engages with parents and neighborhood leaders in a formal and meaningful way, including seeking input for policy and programming decisions;

Requirements for serving children who are dual-language learners, which must, at a minimum, include:

Identifying, screening, and assessing children in their home languages;

Communicating with children's parents in their home languages; and

Using teaching strategies that have been shown to meet the needs of children who are dual-language learners;

Requirements for offering voluntary vision, hearing, dental, and health screenings, and, upon parent request, referrals to appropriate health providers for children who are enrolled by a preschool provider; and

Requirements for providing voluntary developmental screenings, which must, at a minimum, include the use of valid and reliable screening tools that are developmentally, culturally, and linguistically appropriate.

Using the procedures specified in subsection (3)(b) of this section, the department shall create a resource bank of preschool curricula for use by preschool providers. The resource bank may include only curricula that, at a minimum:

Are supported by evidence that use of the curricula improves student outcomes;

Are developmentally appropriate, culturally relevant, and linguistically responsive to communities being served;

Promote literacy, as developmentally appropriate, based on the science of reading by providing language development, including speech sounds, vocabulary, grammar, and use, and providing developmentally appropriate instruction to support children's success in early elementary grades when receiving instruction pursuant to the "Colorado READ Act", part 12 of article 7 of title 22, in the areas of phonemic awareness; phonics; vocabulary development; reading fluency, including oral skills; and reading comprehension; and

Are aligned with the Colorado early learning and development guidelines approved by the early childhood leadership commission.

The department shall develop and implement a procedure for identifying the curricula it includes in the resource bank of preschool curricula. At a minimum, the procedure must include:

Soliciting through public notice, accepting, and promptly reviewing curricula from preschool providers and from publishers;

Evaluating the curricula that the department identifies or receives, which evaluation is based on the criteria specified in subsection (3)(a) of this section and any additional criteria specified in department rule;

Providing notice to preschool providers and publishers that submit curricula concerning whether the submitted curricula was included in the resource bank and, if excluded from the resource bank, the reasons for exclusion; and

Reviewing the resource bank at least every three years to update the resource bank and add curricula when appropriate. In reviewing and updating the resource bank, the department shall, at a minimum, comply with the procedures described in subsections (3)(b)(I) to (3)(b)(III) of this section.

The department shall allow preschool providers and publishers to submit curricula to the department at any time to be reviewed and considered for inclusion in the resource bank, regardless of the schedule for reviewing the resource bank. The department shall review all submitted curricula in accordance with the adopted procedures described in subsection (3)(b) of this section.

The department shall make the resource bank accessible to the public through the department website.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 693, § 3, effective July 1.

26.5-4-206. Preschool special education services - department collaboration - memorandum of understanding.

The department shall collaborate with the department of education through a memorandum of understanding as described in subsection (2) of this section to ensure all children with disabilities are served equitably in the Colorado universal preschool program, ensure access to classrooms that meet the individual needs of children with disabilities based on their individualized education programs, and ensure that preschool providers operate in accordance with federal and state law concerning education for preschool-age children with disabilities. In collaborating pursuant to this section, the department and the department of education shall, at a minimum:

Support local implementation of best practices;

Create training for preschool providers concerning the legal obligations for serving children with disabilities, including the responsibilities and obligations of administrative units specified in IDEA and ECEA; and

Collaborate to ensure preschool services delivered through the preschool program to children with disabilities are delivered in compliance with IDEA and ECEA.

The department and the department of education shall enter into a memorandum of understanding that, at a minimum:

Defines the roles and responsibilities of both departments, administrative units as defined in section 22-20-103, and preschool providers, recognizing that the department of education is the identified agency responsible for compliance with the part B component of IDEA, as described in section 22-20-103 (4)(b);

Describes data collection and sharing responsibilities in accordance with federal requirements and timelines, ensuring that all critical data can be disaggregated, while adhering to requirements for protecting personally identifiable information;

Describes each department's role in helping preschool providers and communities provide inclusive, individualized, meaningful, culturally relevant, linguistically relevant, active, and participatory learning for all children with disabilities, in accordance with each child's individualized education program;

Establishes procedures for holding all preschool providers accountable for providing access and supports for children with disabilities;

Recommends training programs for preschool providers in working with children with disabilities;

With regard to preschool program rules, establishes processes to:

Ensure that preschool program requirements are in compliance with and do not conflict with IDEA and ECEA; and

Ensure preschool program rules address all legal requirements for the provision of preschool services to eligible children with disabilities.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 697, § 3, effective July 1.

26.5-4-207. Preschool program evaluation and improvement process - independent evaluator.

The department shall develop and implement a process for continuous evaluation and improvement of preschool providers who participate in the Colorado universal preschool program. At a minimum, the process must include a requirement that preschool providers use assessment and continuous improvement strategies that:

Are implemented through a coordinated system that includes the quality standards established in department rule; curriculum; professional development; developmentally appropriate, age-appropriate, and whole-child assessment that may be based on observational assessments of children's development and classroom-based teacher-child interactions; and data collection;

Support both continuous program improvement and the department's independent evaluation of the preschool program as provided in subsection (2) of this section;

Are designed to inform curriculum implementation, professional development, teacher supports, and resource allocation; and

Are appropriate for use with young children and for the purposes for which they are used.

The department shall contract with an independent evaluator to measure the success of the Colorado universal preschool program in improving the overall learning and school readiness of children who receive preschool services through the preschool program. In evaluating the success of the preschool program, the department shall ensure the independent evaluator has access to the necessary data to measure immediate and long-term child outcomes and to provide recommendations to improve teaching and learning, assess professional development inputs and outcomes, and improve teacher-child interactions. The department shall take into account the evaluations and recommendations of the independent evaluator in implementing the process for continuous evaluation and improvement described in subsection (1) of this section.

The department shall communicate the evaluations and recommendations of the independent evaluator to families, communities, preschool providers, local coordinating organizations, the state board of education, and the general assembly, as appropriate, to inform and improve early childhood teaching and education and policy-making related to early childhood education.

The department shall take into account the evaluations and recommendations of the independent evaluator in reviewing and revising the preschool quality standards pursuant to section 26.5-4-205; the plan for recruiting, training, and retaining a high-quality early childhood workforce pursuant to section 26.5-6-101; and the state goals for implementing the preschool program.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 699, § 3, effective July 1.